District of Columbia statutes.
31-3709

Remedies.

In addition to any other applicable penalty for a violation of the insurance laws of the District, the Mayor may require an insurer who violates this subchapter, or rules issued pursuant to this subchapter, to cease marketing in the District any Medicare supplement policy or certificate that is related directly or indirectly to a violation, or may require the issuer to take any actions necessary to comply with the provisions of this subchapter, or both.

History

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 10, 39 DCR 5825

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2619.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3701.